Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 6 DISTRIBUTION OF WATER AMONG APPROPRIATORS
§ 42-619. Alternate plan for payment of district expenses — Treasurer — Election — Oath and bond — Removal — Compensation.

The county commissioners of any county, having determined that providing the service of payment of water district expenses by the county treasurer from water district funds pursuant to section 42-613(2), Idaho Code, is an undue burden upon the county and shall no longer be provided, shall notify the director of the department of water resources of this action by December 1 in the year preceding the year for which the action shall first be effective by providing to the director a certified copy of the resolution of the commissioners taking such action.

Notice of the action of the county commissioners shall be given to the water users of the district by the department of water resources together with the notice of the annual meeting given pursuant to section 42-605, Idaho Code.

At each annual meeting of a district for which the county commissioners have taken the action provided for in subsection (1) of this section, or for which the water users have taken the action provided for in section 42-613(3), Idaho Code, the water users shall provide for the election and appointment of a water district treasurer. If a water district treasurer is not elected at the annual meeting, and one is found to be necessary, the director of the department of water resources is authorized to appoint a water district treasurer and fix the treasurer’s compensation. The water district treasurer shall keep a complete, accurate and permanent record of all moneys received by and disbursed for and on behalf of the district. The water district treasurer shall deposit all moneys of the district in a designated depository approved at the annual meeting and shall comply with the public depository law as contained in chapter 1, title 57, Idaho Code.

Before undertaking the duties of the office, the water district treasurer shall take and subscribe to an oath before an officer authorized by the laws of the state to administer oaths, to faithfully perform the duties of the office, and shall file the oath with the director of the department of water resources. Upon issuance by the director of a certificate confirming the election or appointment of a water district treasurer, the actions taken by the water district treasurer in fulfillment of the duties of the office are covered by the state group surety bond as provided in sections 59-801 through 59-804, Idaho Code. A duly appointed treasurer that is reelected in consecutive years shall not be required to take and file additional oaths with the department of water resources for each consecutive year the treasurer is reelected.

The water district treasurer shall serve until a successor is elected or appointed, and qualified. A water district treasurer may be removed from office by the director for failure to perform the duties of the office in the manner provided for removal of a watermaster as provided by section 42-605(9), Idaho Code.

Compensation for the services of the water district treasurer shall be set at the annual meeting and may be established on a fixed-sum, per diem, or voluntary basis. If a water district treasurer is appointed by the director in the absence of being elected at the annual meeting, the director shall fix the compensation to be paid, if any.

With respect to any district for which the county commissioners have taken the action provided for in subsection (1) of this section, or for which the water users have taken the action provided for in section 42-613(3), Idaho Code, [,] the county auditor shall in the time and manner provided by section 63-1202, Idaho Code, transmit to the water district treasurer of the water district a settlement of all moneys belonging to such district paid into the county treasury and apportioned to such water district on or after the second Monday of the preceding month; provided, however, that in the months of July and January, the money may be transmitted no later than the 25th of the month. The treasurer of the water district shall immediately deposit the funds in the designated depository for the district.
(8) The treasurer of the water district shall disburse moneys from the water district account only upon submission of a written voucher approved by the watermaster for expenses incurred for water district purposes related to the delivery of water or by a voucher approved by the chairman of the advisory committee for activities pursuant to resolutions adopted by the water users from district funds or funds retained pursuant to section 42-613A, Idaho Code.

(9) It shall be the duty of the water district treasurer to prepare a statement of the financial affairs of the district at the end of each fiscal year and to file the statement with the director of the department of water resources. An audit of the financial affairs of the district shall be made as required in section 67-450B, Idaho Code. A certified copy of the audit shall be filed with the director of the department of water resources following the audit.

(10) In water districts with an annual budget of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) or less, the water users may, by resolution adopted at the annual meeting, authorize the watermaster to serve as water district treasurer. Watermasters in water districts with annual budgets in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) shall not be authorized to act as water district treasurer.

§ 42-620. Additional water district expenses relating to costs of the department of water resources for administration of water rights on the eastern snake river plain. [Repealed.]